Utah statutes.
63H-1-403.   Notice of project area plan adoption -- Effective date of plan -- Contesting the formation of the plan.

(1) (a)  Upon the board's adoption of a project area plan, the board shall provide notice as provided in Subsection (1)(b) by:

(i)  publishing or causing to be published a notice:

(A)  in a newspaper of general circulation within the authority's boundaries; and

(B)  as required in Section 45-1-101; or

(ii)  if there is no newspaper of general circulation within the authority's boundaries as described in Subsection (1)(a)(i)(A), causing a notice to be posted in at least three public places within the authority's boundaries.

(b)  Each notice under Subsection (1)(a) shall:

(i)  set forth the board resolution adopting the project area plan or a summary of the resolution; and

(ii)  include a statement that the project area plan is available for general public inspection and the hours for inspection.

(2)  The project area plan shall become effective on the date of:

(a)  if notice was published under Subsection (1)(a), publication of the notice; or

(b)  if notice was posted under Subsection (1)(a), posting of the notice.

(3)  The authority shall make the adopted project area plan available to the general public at its offices during normal business hours.

(4)  Within 10 days after adopting a project area plan that establishes a project area, or after adopting an amendment to a project area plan under which the boundary of a project area is modified, the authority shall send notice of the establishment or modification of the project area and an accurate map or plat of the project area to:

(a)  the State Tax Commission;

(b)  the Automated Geographic Reference Center created in Section 63F-1-506; and

(c)  the assessor and recorder of each county in which the project area is located.



Amended by Chapter 92, 2009 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 388, 2009 General Session

